Hawaii, session 2026, GM1124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
PART I
SECTION 1. Section 235-12.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§235-12.5 Renewable energy technologies; income tax
credit. (a) Each individual or corporate taxpayer that files
an individual or corporate net income tax return for a taxable
year may claim a tax credit under this section against the
Hawaii state individual or corporate net income tax [-r] ; provided
that the taxpayer's adjusted gross income does not exceed
$175,000 if filing as an individual, or $350,000 if filing
jointly. The tax credit may be claimed for every eligible
renewable energy technology system that is installed and placed
in service in the State by a taxpayer during the taxable year.
The tax credit may be claimed as follows:
(1) For each solar energy system: thirty-five per cent of
the actual cost or the cap amount determined in
subsection (b); provided that:
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO. So”
C.D. 2
(A) For taxable years beginning after December 31
2019, and except as provided in subparagraphs (B)
and (C), no tax credit may be claimed for a solar
energy system that is five megawatts in total
output capacity or larger and requires a power
purchase agreement approved by the public
utilities commission;
(B) A solar energy system that is five megawatts in
total output capacity or larger, installed and
placed in service pursuant to a power purchase
agreement approved or pending approval by a
decision and order by the public utilities
commission prior to December 31, 2019, shall
continue to receive a tax credit equal to
thirty-five per cent of the actual cost, or
$500,000 per solar energy system that has a total
output capacity of at least one thousand
kilowatts per system of direct current, whichever
is less; and
(C) For each solar energy system integrated with a
pumped hydroelectric energy storage system, the
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 2
■niiiiiHiniiimiminiii

S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
tax credit may be claimed for thirty-five per
cent of the actual cost or the cap amount
determined in subsection (b), whichever is less;
provided that applicable project approval filings
have been made to the public utilities commission
by December 31, 2021; or
(2) For each wind-powered energy system: twenty per cent
of the actual cost or the cap amount determined in
subsection (b), whichever is less;
provided further that multiple owners of a single system shall
be entitled to a single tax credit; and provided further that
the tax credit shall be apportioned between the owners in
proportion to their contribution to the cost of the system.
In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or
trust, the tax credit allowable is for every eligible renewable
energy technology system that is installed and placed in service
in the State by the entity. The cost upon which the tax credit
is computed shall be determined at the entity level.
Distribution and share of credit shall be determined pursuant to
administrative rule.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 3

Page 4 3125
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
(b) The amount of credit allowed for each eligible
renewable energy technology system shall not exceed the
applicable cap amount, which is determined as follows:
If the primary purpose of the solar energy system is
to use energy from the sun to heat water for household
use, then the cap amounts shall be:
(A) $2,250 per system for single-family residential
property;
(B) $350 per unit per system for multi-family
residential property; and
(C) $250,000 per system for commercial property;
(2) For all other solar energy systems, the cap amounts
shall be:
(A) $5,000 per system for single-family residential
property; provided that if all or a portion of
the system is used to fulfill the substitute
renewable energy technology requirement pursuant
to section 196-6.5 (a) (3), the credit shall be
reduced by thirty-five per cent of the actual
system cost or $2,250, whichever is less;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx
■iiiiiiiiiiiniiiiHiiiiii

Page 5 S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
(B) $350 per unit per system for multi-family
residential property; and
(C) $500,000 per system for commercial property; and
(3) For all wind-powered energy systems, the cap amounts
shall be:
(A) $1,500 per system for single-family residential
property; provided that if all or a portion of
the system is used to fulfill the substitute
renewable energy technology requirement pursuant
to section 196-6.5 (a) (3), the credit shall be
reduced by twenty per cent of the actual system
cost or $1,500, whichever is less;
(B) $200 per unit per system for multi-family
residential property; and
(C) $500,000 per system for commercial property.
(c) The total amount of tax credits allowed under this
section in any particular year shall be as follows:
(1) For calendar year 2027, $40,000,000;
(2) For calendar year 2028, $40,000,000;
(3) For calendar year 2029, $40,000,000;
(4) For calendar year 2030, $40,000,000; and
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 6 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
(5) Beginning January 1, 2031, $0.
[-(-e-)-] (d) For the purposes of this section:
"Actual cost" means costs related to the renewable energy
technology systems under subsection (a), including accessories
and installation, but not including the cost of consumer
incentive premiums unrelated to the operation of the system or
offered with the sale of the system and costs for which another
credit is claimed under this chapter.
"Household use" means any use to which heated water is
commonly put in a residential setting, including commercial
application of those uses.
"Renewable energy technology system" means a new system
that captures and converts a renewable source of energy, such as
solar or wind energy, into:
(1) A usable source of thermal or mechanical energy;
(2) Electricity; or
(3) Fuel.
"Solar or wind energy system" means any identifiable
facility, equipment, apparatus, or the like that converts solar
or wind energy to useful thermal or electrical energy for
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 7
S.B. NO. ""
C.D, 2
heating, cooling, or reducing the use of other types of energy
that are dependent upon fossil fuel for their generation.
[4^] (e) For taxable years beginning after December 31,
2005, the dollar amount of any utility rebate shall be deducted
from the cost of the qualifying system and its installation
before applying the state tax credit.
(f) Every taxpayer, before March 1 of each year in which a
renewable energy technology system was installed and placed in
service in the previous taxable year, shall submit a written,
certified statement to the Hawaii state energy office of the
department of business, economic development, and tourism
identifying:
(1) The adjusted gross income of the taxpayer;
(2) The actual cost of each renewable energy technology
system installed and placed in service in the previous
taxable year; and
(3) The amount of tax credits claimed pursuant to this
section, if any, in the previous taxable year.
(g) The Hawaii state energy office of the department of
business, economic development, and tourism shall:
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 8 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
(1) Certify the eligibility of each system used to claim a
credit under this section;
(2) Certify that each taxpayer claiming a credit under
this section meets all requirements; and
(3) Issue a certificate to each taxpayer specifying the
amount of credit the taxpayer may claim.
The taxpayer shall file the certificate with the taxpayer's tax
return to the department of taxation. Notwithstanding the
authority of the Hawaii state energy office, the director of
taxation may audit and adjust the tax credit amount to conform
to the facts.
(h) If in any calendar year the annual amount of certified
credits reaches the amount specified in subsection (c) in the
aggregate, the specified amount shall be divided between all
taxpayers claiming a credit under this section for that year in
proportion to the amount of costs claimed by all taxpayers;
provided that;
(1) The Hawaii state energy office of the department of
business, economic development, and tourism shall
establish an annual application period ending on
March 1 of each year at 5:00 p.m. Hawaii Standard
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

S.B. NO.
'C.D.2
Time; provided further that the office shall determine
the opening date of the application period by rule;
(2) By May 31 of each year the Hawaii state energy office
shall notify each applicant of the credit amount
certified; and
If the total credits applied for by all taxpayers are
no more than the amount specified in subsection (c),
each taxpayer shall receive the full amount of the
credit applied for, subject to verification of actual
costs.
In no instance shall the Hawaii state energy office certify a
total amount of credits exceeding the amount specified in
subsection (c) per calendar year. The department of taxation
shall not allow the aggregate amount of credits claimed to
exceed that amount per calendar year.
[-fe-h] (i) The director of taxation shall prepare any forms
that may be necessary to claim a tax credit under this section,
including forms identifying the technology type of each tax
credit claimed under this section, whether for solar or wind.
The director may also require the taxpayer to furnish reasonable
information to ascertain the validity of the claim for credit
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 10
S.B. NO. ""
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
made under this section and may adopt rules necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this section pursuant to chapter 91.
[4^] (j) If the tax credit under this section exceeds the
taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess of the credit over
liability may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's income
tax liability in subsequent years until exhausted, unless
otherwise elected by the taxpayer pursuant to subsection [-fg-h]
(k) or [(h).] (1). All claims for the tax credit under this
section, including amended claims, shall be filed on or before
the end of the twelfth month following the close of the taxable
year for which the credit may be claimed. Failure to comply
with this subsection shall constitute a waiver of the right to
claim the credit.
[4^] (k) For solar energy systems, a taxpayer may elect
to reduce the eligible credit amount by thirty per cent and if
this reduced amount exceeds the amount of income tax payment due
from the taxpayer, the excess of the credit amount over payments
due shall be refunded to the taxpayer; provided that tax credit
amounts properly claimed by a taxpayer who has no income tax
liability shall be paid to the taxpayer; and provided further
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 11 S.B. NO. ””
C.D. 2
that no refund on account of the tax credit allowed by this
section shall be made for amounts less than $1.
The election required by this subsection shall be made in a
manner prescribed by the director on the taxpayer's return for
the taxable year in which the system is installed and placed in
service. A separate election may be made for each separate
system that generates a credit. An election once made is
irrevocable.
(1) Notwithstanding subsection [(g),] (k) , for any
renewable energy technology system, an individual taxpayer may
elect to have any excess of the credit over payments due
refunded to the taxpayer, if:
(1) All of the taxpayer's income is exempt from taxation
under section 235-7 (a) (2) or (3); or
(2) The taxpayer's adjusted gross income is $20,000 or
less (or $40,000 or less if filing a tax return as
married filing jointly);
provided that tax credits properly claimed by a taxpayer who has
no income tax liability shall be paid to the taxpayer; and
provided further that no refund on account of the tax credit
allowed by this section shall be made for amounts less than $1.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 1
ilillNIIHIIHIilllll

Page 12
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
A husband and wife who do not file a joint tax return shall
only be entitled to make this election to the extent that they
would have been entitled to make the election had they filed a
joint tax return.
The election required by this subsection shall be made in a
manner prescribed by the director on the taxpayer's return for
the taxable year in which the system is installed and placed in
service. A separate election may be made for each separate
system that generates a credit. An election once made is
irrevocable.
[-(-i-)-] (m) No taxpayer shall be allowed a credit under this
section for the portion of the renewable energy technology
system required by section 196-6.5 that is installed and placed
in service on any newly constructed single-family residential
property authorized by a building permit issued on or after
January 1, 2010.
[-^^] (n) To the extent feasible, using existing resources
to assist the energy-efficiency policy review and evaluation,
the department shall assist with data collection on the
following for each taxable year:
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 12
■NIHHMIIIIMIIMWIillllll

Page 13 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
(1) The number of renewable energy technology systems that
have qualified for a tax credit during the calendar
year by;
(A) Technology type; and
(B) Taxpayer type (corporate and individual); and
(2) The total cost of the tax credit to the State during
the taxable year by:
(A) Technology type; and
(B) Taxpayer type.
[-He)-] (o) This section shall apply to eligible renewable
energy technology systems that are installed and placed in
service on or after July 1, 2009.
(p) This section shall not apply to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2029."
SECTION 2. Section 235-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a), (b), and (c) to read as
follows:
" (a) There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of
every:
(1) Taxpayer who files a joint return under section
235-93; and
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 13
liiiiiiiaiiiiiiuiiiHniiiii

Page 14 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
(2) Surviving spouse,
a tax determined in accordance with the following table:
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2017
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $4,800 1.40% of taxable income
Over $4,800 but $67.00 plus 3.20% of
not over $9,600 excess over $4,800
Over $9,600 but $221.00 plus 5.50% of
not over $19,200 excess over $9,600
Over $19,200 but $749.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $28,800 excess over $19,200
Over $28,800 but $1,363.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $38,400 excess over $28,800
Over $38,400 but $2,016.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $48,000 excess over $38,400
Over $48,000 but $2,707.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $72,000 excess over $48,000
Over $72,000 but $4,531.00 plus 7.90% of
not over $96,000 excess over $72,000
Over $96,000 but $6,427.00 plus 8.25% of
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx
iiMiHiiinnnHiiiniiiin

Page 15 S.B. NO.
s"
C.D. 2
not over $300,000 excess over $96,000
Over $300,000 but $23,257.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $350,000 excess over $300,000
Over $350,000 but $27,757.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $400,000 excess over $350,000
Over $400,000 $32,757.00 plus 11.00% of
excess over $400,000.
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2024:
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $19,200 1.40% of taxable income
Over $19,200 but $269.00 plus 3.20% of
not over $28,800 excess over $19,200
Over $28,800 but $576.00 plus 5.50% of
not over $38,400 excess over $28,800
Over $38,400 but $1,104.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $48,000 excess over $38,400
Over $48,000 but $1,718.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $72,000 excess over $48,000
Over $72,000 but $3,350.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $96,000 excess over $72,000
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 15

Page 16 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
Over $96,000 but $5,078.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $250,000 excess over $96,000
Over $250,000 but $16,782.00 plus 7.90% of
not over $350,000 excess over $250,000
Over $350,000 but $24,682.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $450,000 excess over $350,000
Over $450,000 but $32,932.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $550,000 excess over $450,000
Over $550,000 but $41,932.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $650,000 excess over $550,000
Over $650,000 $51,932.00 plus 11.00% of
excess over $650,000.
[In th-e eaoG of any taxab-lre—year beginn-ing-aftor—DoeefRbcr
3^

LclALtUXU XilUUHlU X 1G C. J k oil kJ X X XJv^^i
INUL UV T T C X V . coo O , O O f U T f U ^ 1X • ZA AkJQ V. kJ X k* kJ J k kJ VU's *1 kz» Jt» 11 rk*z rkMJ I*InI k*
UVGX I? Z 0 OUU DUt. C/tno_ nn r>1nn ? 90^ nf
"S kJ J • kJ kJ X klU 0 • Z kJ 0 kJ X
liO V- O V CX f J U kJ
U^UGoU kJVGX i?ZO^ OkJkJ
kz X kJ kJ XJ kJ I? / X nkJ » DkJ OkJ TjJ Xil kml U 0R « 0 kJ t) kJX
nOL. OVGi i?‘lO/UUkJ
G G tJ kJ G V G X IkJkJ
—$-4 8>-0&-Q but $1/2-3 0^ pluD 6.40% of
7-
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 16
■■■inniinwHiHiiii

Page 17
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
not over $72,000 cxcc-og- over $48,000
Over—$72,000 but $2,774-;0-0 plug 6.80% of
not over $96,000 cxccoo over $72->000
Over $96,000 but $4,4Q6^tHj plug 7.20% of
not over $250,000 cxcGoo—over $-9^000
Over—$250,000 but $15, 494.-00 plug 7.60% of
net—ove^^—$350,000 GXGGOO over $2-50,000
Over $350>000-but $23,094.00 plug 7;90% of
not ove-r—$-4-5-0-, 000 GXGGog ovGr $350,000
Qv-e^—$-450,000 but $30, 994.00 pl-uo-8rrg5% of
net—ovoc-$550,000 exeees—eve-r—$450,000
Over $550,000 but $39,244.00 plug 9.00% of
not over $650,000 GXGGGo—ovGr $5-59-, 00-Q
Over $650,000 but $48,244.00 plug 10.00% of
ne-t-ovor $800,000 GXGGGO—ovGr $-650,000
Over—$800, 000 $63,244.00 plug 11.00% of
GX-GGOG OVGr $800>000.
In thG-GQGG of any tuxublo your beginning—aft-et DGCGinbGr
31, -202-8-^
If tho taxablG incomo io; Tho tax ohall bo:
Not ovGr $38,400 -l-r4-0-%—ef-^te-xab4e—ineeffte
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 18 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
Over $38,400 but $538.00 plug 3.20^-©t
not over $48,000 exceoo-over $38, 400
Over $48, 000 bu-t $845.00 plus 5.50% -of
net—©ver—$-?57-0-&O- cxceoo over $48,000
Over $72,000- bu-fe $2,165.00 plus 6.40% of
not ©ver—$96,000 excess over $72,000
Over $96,000 but- $3,701.00 -ptue—6.80% of
not over $250,000 excess-©ver—$ 96>000
Over $250-,Q00--but $14,173.0 0- -pluo-?^0%--©t
not—©ver—$350,000 cxccos over $250,000
Over $3-507000—but $21,373.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $450,000 excess over $350,000
Over $450,000 but $28,973-.-90 plus 7.90% of
not—ever $550,000 excess over $450>-0Q-Q
Over- $550,000 but $36,873.00 plus 8.25% of
net—©ver—$^5O-7-0-OO- excess- over $550/000
Over $650,000 but $45,123.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $800,-0-0-0 cxccso—©ver—$650,000
Over—$800,000 but $58,623.-00 plus 10.00% ©f
not over- $950,000 oxcGSS over $800,000
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 19
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
Over $950,000 $73,623.00 pluo ll-.-00% of-
GXOGOO—over $950,000.]
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2026:
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $28,800 1.40% of taxable income
Over $28,800 but $403.00 plus 2.50% of
not over $38,400 excess over $28,800
Over $38,400 but $643.00 plus 5.00% of
not over $48,000 excess over $38,400
Over $48,000 but $1,123.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $72,000 excess over $48,000
Over $72,000 but $2,659.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $96,000 excess over $72,000
Over $96,000 but $4,291.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $250,000 excess over $96,000
Over $250,000 but $15,379.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $350,000 excess over $250,000
Over $350,000 but $22,979.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $450,000 excess over $350,000
Over $450,000 but $31,229.00 plus 9.00% of
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 20
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
not over $550,000 excess over $450,000
Over $550,000 but $40,229.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $650,000 excess over $550,000
Over $650,000 but $50,229.00 plus 11.00% of
not over $1,000,000 excess over $650,000
Over $1,000,000 $88,729.00 plus 13.00% of
excess over $1,000,000.
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2028:
I_f_Uw__ta2£a^le__imcome_^;_^ The tax shall be:
Not over $38,400 1.40% of taxable income
Over $38,400 but $538.00 plus 2.50% of
not over $48,000 excess over $38,400
Over $48,000 but $778.00 plus 5.00% of
not over $72,000 excess over $48,000
Over $72,000 but $1,978.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $96,000 excess over $72,000
Over $96,000 but $3,514.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $250,000 excess over $96,000
Over $250,000 but $13,986.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $350,000 excess over $250,000
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 21 S.B. NO. s’"
C.D. 2
Over $350,000 but $21,186.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $450,000 excess over $350,000
Over $450,000 but $29,436.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $550,000 excess over $450,000
Over $550,000 but $38,436.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $650,000 excess over $550,000
Over $650,000 but $48,436.00 plus 11.00% of
not over $1,000,000 excess over $650,000
Over $1,000,000 $86,936.00 plus 13.00% of
excess over $1,000,000.
(b) There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of every
head of a household a tax determined in accordance with the
following table:
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2017:
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $3,600 1.40% of taxable income
Over $3,600 but $50.00 plus 3.20% of
not over $7,200 excess over $3,600
Over $7,200 but $166.00 plus 5.50% of
not over $14,400 excess over $7,200
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx
IIIHMIinilllHIIIIIIIHIII

Page 22
S.B. NO.
' • h.D. 1
C.D. 2
Over $14,400 but $562.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $21,600 excess over $14,400
Over $21,600 but $1,022.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $28,800 excess over $21,600
Over $28,800 but $1,512.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $36,000 excess over $28,800
Over $36,000 but $2,030.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $54,000 excess over $36,000
Over $54,000 but $3,398.00 plus 7.90% of
not over $72,000 excess over $54,000
Over $72,000 but $4,820.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $225,000 excess over $72,000
Over $225,000 but $17,443.00 plus 9.00% o
not over $262,500 excess over $225,000
Over $262,500 but $20,818.00 plus 10.00%
not over $300,000 excess over $262,500
Over $300,000 $24,568.00 plus 11.00%
excess over $300,000.
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2024:
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 22
■■iBBiiiiiiiMniiiiiniiiii

Page 23 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $14,400 1.40% of taxable income
Over $14,400 but $202.00 plus 3.20% of
not over $21,600 excess over $14,400
Over $21,600 but $432.00 plus 5.50% of
not over $28,800 excess over $21,600
Over $28,800 but $828.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $36,000 excess over $28,800
Over $36,000 but $1,289.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $54,000 excess over $36,000
Over $54,000 but $2,513.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $72,000 excess over $54,000
Over $72,000 but $3,809.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $187,500 excess over $72,000
Over $187,500 but $12,587.00 plus 7.90% of
not over $262,500 excess over $187,500
Over $262,500 but $18,512.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $337,500 excess over $262,500
Over $337,500 but $24,699.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $412,500 excess over $337,500
Over $412,500 but $31,449.00 plus 10.00% of
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 24
S.B. NO.
* • H.D. 1
C.D. 2
not over $487,500 excess over $412,500
Over $487,500 $38,949.00 plus 11.00% of
excess over $487,500.
[In the case of any—taxable- year beginning after December
-3-1, 202 6-i-
If the taxable—i-ncomc is; The tax shall be;
Not over $21,600 1.40% of—t-axable-'income
Over $21,600 but $302.00 -plus—3.2-0% of
net—ever $2-8,800 excess over—$21,600
Over $28,800 but -$-5-33.00-pl-uo 5.50-%-of
not over $36,000 exGoss over $28,800
Over -$36,000 but ^-2-9.0 0 -plu s 6.4-8%-- o f
not over $54,000 cxeose—over $36,000
G-ver $-54-,-Q00 but ^2,081.0^-plus 6-7-80% of
not—ever $72,000 excess over $54,000
Over $72,000 but $3,305.00 plus 7.20% of
not—ever $187,500 excess- over $-72,000
Over $1-87,500-but ^ll,621r-90 pluo-7.60% of
net-e-ver - ■ $262,500 excess over $187,500
Over $262,500 but $17,321.00 pluo-7.90% of
not-over $337,500 excess over $262,500
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx
■iHfliwniiiimiiii

Page 25 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D.2
Over $337,500 but $23,246.00 pluo 8.25% of
0/1*10 eno
TTv^ L. Lx V Lx X ^IX^^OLJLJ ^2 JkCe dd LJ V Lx X 'Y*d.>>/^ddd
LJvLJi JJLiL ■ 4 P S 9 2 0 iU ^ • < ‘i 3 j 9 j » P dd V p 7 X 1 u . d p n y .d n d no o . Ox -p

T
r%
T^
z~
x
s -
L
f
»
- [
L
Q
z
T
V
V
X
l^zip'7
f
^nn
\J sx?L Lx Lx uJ
Z
LJ
T
V
T
L
Z
x
V
X
*
Y
C ^
X X
IO
^x f ^
C
J
f
d
^ r
d
i
0^00 onri V^n +• -.e-pr _*|Q7 00 -nine TO 00^ of
VJVLJX i?'JO//UUU XJUL- J U f Xos.^ • dd ^J X LX X d • d d C LJ X

11U C U V UX uuu C X Lx Lx d uJ O V C X PJO/^Odd
VV T / L *^ J X Y~ - * 0 ? -^ D Q L/ - U Q / 0 L/ 0 U 0 U 1 1 _f_ Zl d9 ^9 «-d0d0 y£Ji Xin LXn O X X « nd ndo C, OX
<7.^»Z7X7«7<7 Z7TTZ7%.7 02^/*^^ 0^^
Lx Lx d d LJ V Lx X ‘yddd^ddd*
Trx 4-H/-S z-i -X <-« rx-P -{--xxy-xVxTz-s * T <7 -7 •W»
Xii UliLJ LJLIULJ (JX Ulll^ LLlJLmJXLJ y LJ lxx ULJy XliliXXiy lIXIxLJX OLJLJLJXllkJLJX
o n o n o-Q-^-
O X 21 u z 0 :

XX L, 1X Lx l_> d ^XX/ X X» XXX Lx LzX 11 Lx X □ • ^t^TiSxx d'XJL ixzXXiX«L z<7sx^i
^IMiT <LJ0 "l^x LJ▼V T LJX ^o^o-Oo^ OAUOLOJ X • 1 d u OX X<XJL^XJdXLx XixLxLJlTlLx
r\.,r^Y- QOO Kni- ..PA07 00 7-71 -z7 Q ono. X7p
LJ V LJ i V z V U U L. 9^d^.dd pXUO d.ZUO Ox
7x7i vrx*7k ■x{- U V Lx yX* I? 0UU0L0J LJ ALJLJ dd U V O X i^zlO^Odd
Z
L
O
J
T
V
y f
L
~>
x X
y-
*
O
P d
O
L>

U

U

U
V
X
v
/

d
'f
L
~
. V
e r
d d
*□ 4
»
n
d
n
d JJ X
i ,
L
,
X kJ d
c
• d
e n
d
o
U
.
Cz
-pi
77 <-s LJ V Lx XY* Pv LJ/Ii ^lJ0d 0L 0/ Lx JL Lx Lx d kJ O V O' X V d d d d
0*1 ^30^ v71 1T I-' 23 ^no. x>P
LJVLIX U 4 / U U U XJUL ipX^OZ^^UU pxUd n.ndo Ox
177X PUl Lx fL7J TV 7 LJyX“ i?/21^LJ0U0L0J © JL C Lx kJ kJ O V C X V 0 * ITvzvT
0L1J 3V r pLJ* X** •o? o/ o21 nd nu nu lUo Un tL'. ‘ o ? o 2 i, 9 / ? /o .d n d n p yk x i. u ,r d k 2 * 3 o .o on d o tj . xo '. xp
1771 Lpy\- flx- PLJi TV TLfx^ Xy .‘jPz XI P'.J 1 -L^J 0d 0d LJ JLL. Lx d d LJV\x.X *7 T f \J \J
Over- $-3 7,500 but $10,630.00-p-ltts-?■;-^-0-% of
r^
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 26
S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
not over $262,500 exeoog over $187/500
Over $262,500 but $-16-,-0-3Ot00 plug 7.60% of
ftet—©ver—$-3^47-&^ oxoogg over $2-62->-500
Over-- $33-7-/500 ■■but $21,730.00 plug 7.90% of
not over $412,500 exoogg over ■$3-3'7>500
Over-$412,500 but ■$-2-7-,-6-5-5-;-00 plug 8.25% of
not-©ver—$4"8?-,-50Q oxcegg—over $412,500
Over $487,500 but $33-,-8 4-2 ;-0 0 plug 9.00% of
■net— o ve-r— $ 6 0 0 > 000 oxeeso over $487,500
Over $600,000 but $43,967.00 plug 10.00% of
eefe—©ver—$-7-12,500 exeeeg—©ver—$60-0, 000
Over $712> 500 ■$55'/-2-l-7-.-00 plug 11.00% of
exees-s—©ver—$712,500.]
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2026:
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not oyer$21^600 1.40% of taxable income
Over $21,600 but $302.00 plus 2.50% of
not over $28,800 excess over $21,600
Over $28,800 but $482.00 plus 5.00% of
not over $36,000 excess over $28,800
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 27 S.B. NO. SS’i
C.D. 2
Over $36,000 but $842.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $54,000 excess over $36,000
Over $54,000 but $1,994.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $72,000 excess over $54,000
Over $72,000 but $3,218.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $187,500 excess over $72,000
Over $187,500 but $11,534.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $262,500 excess over $187,500
Over $262,500 but $17,234.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $337,500 excess over $262,500
Over $337,500 but $23,422.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $412,500 excess over $337,500
Over $412,500 but $30,172.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $487,500 excess over $412,500
Over $487,500 but $37,672.00 plus 11.00% of
not over $750,000 excess over $487,500
Over $750,000 $66,547.00 plus 13.00% of
excess over $750,000.
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2028:
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 27
liiiniHiiimiiininiiiiii

Page 28 3125
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $28,800 1.40% of taxable income
Over $28,800 but $403.00 plus 2.50% of
not over $36,000 excess over $28,800
Over $36,000 but $583.00 plus 5.00% of
not over $54,000 excess over $36,000
Over $54,000 but $1,483.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $72,000 excess over $54,000
Over $72,000 but $2,635.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $187,500 excess over $72,000
Over $187,500 but $10,489.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $262,500 excess over $187,500
Over $262,500 but $15,889.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $337,500 excess over $262,500
Over $337,500 but $22,077.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $412,500 excess over $337,500
Over $412,500 but $28,827.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $487,500 excess over $412,500
Over $487,500 but $36,327.00 plus 11.00% of
not over $750,000 excess over $487,500
Over $750,000 $65,202.00 plus 13.00% of
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 28
llllllilMlillHHiinilHIH

Page 29 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
excess over $750,000.
(c) There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of (1)
every unmarried individual (other than a surviving spouse, or
the head of a household) and (2) on the taxable income of every
S married individual who does not make a single return jointly
with the individual's spouse under section 235-93 a tax
determined in accordance with the following table:
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2017:
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $2,400 1.40% of taxable income
Over $2,400 but $34.00 plus 3.20% of
not over $4,800 excess over $2,400
Over $4,800 but $110.00 plus 5.50% of
not over $9,600 excess over $4,800
Over $9,600 but $374.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $14,400 excess over $9,600
Over $14,400 but $682.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $19,200 excess over $14,400
Over $19,200 but $1,008.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $24,000 excess over $19,200
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 30 S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
Over $24,000 but $1,354.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $36,000 excess over $24,000
Over $36,000 but $2,266.00 plus 7.90% of
not over $48,000 excess over $36,000
Over $48,000 but $3,214.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $150,000 excess over $48,000
Over $150,000 but $11,629.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $175,000 excess over $150,000
Over $175,000 but $13,879.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $200,000 excess over $175,000
Over $200,000 $16,379.00 plus 11.00% of
excess over $200,000.
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2024:
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $9,600 1.40% of taxable income
Over $9,600 but $134.00 plus 3.20% of
not over $14,400 excess over $9,600
Over $14,400 but $288.00 plus 5.50% of
not over $19,200 excess over $14,400
Over $19,200 but $552.00 plus 6.40% of
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
not over $24,000 excess over $19,200
Over $24,000 but $859.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $36,000 excess over $24,000
Over $36,000 but $1,675.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $48,000 excess over $36,000
Over $48,000 but $2,539.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $125,000 excess over $48,000
Over $125,000 but $8,391.00 plus 7.90% of
not over $175,000 excess over $125,000
Over $175,000 but $12,341.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $225,000 excess over $175,000
Over $225,000 but $16,466.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $275,000 excess over $225,000
Over $275,000 but $20,966.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $325,000 excess over $275,000
Over $325,000 $25,966.00 plus 11.00% of
excess over $325,000.
[In the case of any taxable year—bcginni-ng after December

I-f the taxable income is! The tax ahall- bc:
Not over $14,400 lrr40^r-©^—-taxafeie—ifteome
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 31

Page 32
S.B. NO. ’aS’i
C.D. 2
Over $3:4,400 but $202.00 pluo 3.20% of
ftet—over $19,200 ox e c a 9— o vc-r— $ 1-4 >- 400
Over—$19,200 but $■355.-00 pluo 5.50% of
not over $24,000 oxceoo over $1-9—2-00
OvoiE^$2-4> 000 but $-619-00 pluo 6.40% of
not over $36,000 ex-eoo-9—over- $-2-47-000
Over ■■$36, 000 but $1-^387.00 pluo 6.80% of
•net—$-4-87-0^ excooo ©ver—$36> 000
Over $48,000 but $2,203.00 pluo 7.20% of
not over $125,000 e-xee-o-o-ovcr $48,000
Over $1-25, 000 but $7,747.00 pluo 7.60% of
■not over $-175,000 oxceoo ovor $125,000
Over $175,000 but $11,547.00 pluo 7.90% of
not over $225,000 oxceoo ovor $175,000
Over $225'>-000 but $15,497.00 pluo 8.25% of
no-t over ■ $275,000 excooo over $225,000
Over $275,000 but $l-9-> 622-.00 pluo-9.00% of
not'over $325,000 oxceoo over $2-75>000
Over $325>'000 but $24,122.00 pluo 10.00% of
fl-o-t—over $400,000 oxceoo over $325,000
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx
■IIDiinilllNMIlilH

Page 33 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
Over $40-07-QO& .$.34r7-€22-T^^-pteS-4^r.r6^^--&^-

kO V k^ X <^iL/kJ/kJuU«
1 O *1C CL 0 C O J— CL II cLJO ycQic Vjjyk<^j«yy rx4 iyiyiyiyxy x'ni yCT —cnL-'FX’bL-fi^o-xy* Pjo>ik^. c^*crk^.T.nntVjo^^yx*
eJS J1—. f Q21- XUX O-Oft -x• -'
L. uL zx CL JO J- ± n □ n • • "*p yJ^1 yx^S- ^L» nvL vJy OnHil dn XI X1 _VJOy fvs3 -*•-
XT ▼ y 0 *1 Q O /*! X*1 • zA nkJ Q0> kO X (_X Jv m d-n J VOx X I fk^* XT 1TT1LJlllk.^
W Z*\y c T »- ' N X v- < 0 ? *1 Xi>fZlU r\ ^ U l D »-^ U y -1 L 4- . i e ? o 21 ^ O Q O - « n U n U r |J r X ln LI n U » ? 3 y2 9 1U 0 'T ^ ) ' 'U nF X
y
f
>
l OL
4—
. O
y
V
y
C Jt
O

O

^
^/ UUU
xk2-s Jyifyu-yk^j- xuoui-y lk**^jTvyu|*~x>y iC?lx Qy ^29i ful v11
U V y y U ^t i C 9 O 21 Z *1 / O U O U O V V J -k JUU V A 4 “ 9 21 * 2 ^ 1 • U kJ » £ - J \ X Ty L y I r L y J O C . O C H V O T - 1 n O F X
y>*> 4- y y /»« y<« C y y x~> ,~i z-\yy<-vy/« C94 (10 0
i 10 L. 0 V C* JT w 000 kJ JlUkJ iJ«J UVL.X i?X‘S/UUU
^Xy y J v l » y C *0 0 0 U 0 kJ 0 U 1 J — O ^ < u y 0 ■i?CXl ^UO21«UnkoJ n£JiXnUnO tOC » A-MAT?T: nkJ FX
y> «"v »y> y y <y, y<y C Z Q OOP z-yyyz-y^z-y/y- j»«vyyz~>.y>» CO^ On<*T
iLOU OVCi 9*ie^UUU kJXkJLJmj UVkJX i?JO^VVU
Wex czQ U n U ri U n D •u^ U y4 L - tCpTx ^OPORUOa koJUn -jOnXl nLin U FO a'OP'VHT?J: pkxJ^XF

not. OVCj. I7X2ID/UUU K??k<?vS. 0*0 kOvL^X ‘Y 1 f \j \J <J
y y x~» y. C I 0 C 0 0 0 Vy 11^ C7 QQF: no n 1 n n 9 90?: nF
V (£ i kpX21Of UUU Jo U t V * > U O O • U U ^XUU / • 21 V 0 kJX

TtxTv. 0 VCJC vX / 000u GXLJkJ LJU kJVUX '7X21iJ^UVU
^*\y y y/y C *1 *~7 C Vy » y CTQ -ror 00 r.Xnn 9 -FO?: nF
JC v X Zo^kJLJL/ Jo Li t *?XV / UOO.UU J^±L1U / • O kJ 0 LJ X

n
y»y
ot- O
y
V
y/"
G
> y.
i
* C
i?
O
1
O

C
D,UU
/*1
U
f*! AjLtxxAL^. a*J.. akJ_ .z&kJx xVi ^L-4» eX_ aLJ.X*d y7£ Ok. ..«kXJm >0X kXJ
Z\yy^ J V — COOC 0 f L r * \ U f\ k r J \ J V O y 1 L 1 i L ^ > V C X i / “ | , / / i ' Q 2O g V *L n /L n / 1 ^ - X 11 L 1 l 1 k n J 7 / ai Q yk fl J ? t : l k n JX f
t y* L \ < U "y L. U y V y . u "y y X <y "I C ? 2 O 1 T / 0 C / V V U k z J -k J y L y/ L -y J ? L -s J < U -y« L * J y k ,-\ O yy v z k -» J y X /» 9 C 2 O 12 O 1 C iJ /kJ O k O Jk O J
Over $275,6-00 but $1 4-36.00-pl-uo .25% of
8/- -8-
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 33

Page 34 S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
not over $325,000 Gxceas- over $275,000
Over $-325,000 but $22,561-;00 pluO'9T-W-of
ftoe—ever—$400, 000 c-x-eeg-s—over $325>000
Over $400,000 but $29,311.00 plug 10.00% of
not -over $4757-00-Q exccao over $ 40-&-,-Q-9-0
Over- ■■$475, 000 $36,811.00 plug 11.00% of
cxcepo ■■■ovc£^$4?5

000 . ]
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2026;
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $14,400 1.40% of taxable income
Over $14,400 but $202.00 plus 2.50% of
not over $19,200 excess over $14,400
Over $19,200 but $322.00 plus 5.00% of
not over $24,000 excess over $19,200
Over $24,000 but $562.00 plus 6.40% of
not over $36,000 excess over $24,000
Over $36,000 but $1,330.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $48,000 excess over $36,000
Over $48,000 but $2,146.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $125,000 excess over $48,000
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx
IIIHVIUIIMinilllUIIH

Page 35
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
Over $125,000 but $7,690.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $175,000 excess over $125,000
Over $175,000 but $11,490.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $225,000 excess over $175,000
Over $225,000 but $15,615.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $275,000 excess over $225,000
Over $275,000 but $20,115.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $325,000 excess over $275,000
Over $325,000 but $25,115.00 plus 11.00% of
not over $500,000 excess over $325,000
Over $500,000 $44,365.00 plus 13.00% of
excess over $500,000.
In the case of any taxable year beginning after December
31, 2028:
If the taxable income is: The tax shall be:
Not over $19,200 1.40% of taxable income
Over $19,200 but $269.00 plus 2.50% of
not over $24,000 excess over $19,200
Over $24,000 but $389.00 plus 5.00% of
not over $36,000 excess over $24,000
Over $36,000 but $989.00 plus 6.40% of
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 35
■iiiniiiiiiiiyiinini

Page 36
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
not over $48,000 excess over $36,000
Over $48,000 but $1,757.00 plus 6.80% of
not over $125,000 excess over $48,000
Over $125,000 but $6,993.00 plus 7.20% of
not over $175,000 excess over $125,000
Over $175,000 but $10,593.00 plus 8.25% of
not over $225,000 excess over $175,000
Over $225,000 but $14,718.00 plus 9.00% of
not over $275,000 excess over $225,000
Over $275,000 but $19,218.00 plus 10.00% of
not over $325,000 excess over $275,000
Over $325,000 but $24,218.00 plus 11.00% of
not over $500,000 excess over $325,000
Over $500,000 $43,468.00 plus 13.00% of
excess over $500,000.”
SECTION 3. Section 235-110.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§235-110.7 Capital goods excise tax credit. (a) There
shall be allowed to each taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by
this chapter a capital goods excise tax credit, which shall be
deductible from the taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 36
■lllliniOIIIIIIHIliiMI

Page 37
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in which the credit
is properly claimed.
The amount of the tax credit shall be four per cent of the
cost of the eligible depreciable tangible personal property used
by the taxpayer in a trade or business and placed in service
within Hawaii after December 31, 2009.
In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or
trust, the tax credit allowable is for eligible depreciable
tangible personal property that is placed in service by the
entity. The cost upon which the tax credit is computed shall be
determined at the entity level. Distribution and share of
credit shall be determined by rules.
In the case of eligible depreciable tangible personal
property for which a credit for sales or use taxes paid to
another state is allowable under section 238-3 (i), the amount of
the tax credit allowed under this section shall not exceed the
amount of use tax actually paid under chapter 238 relating to
the tangible personal property.
If a deduction is taken under section 179 (with respect to
election to expense certain depreciable business assets) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, no tax credit shall
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx
iiininiioiiiiiininiinH

Page 38
S.B. NO.
C.D, 2
be allowed for that portion of the cost of property for which
the deduction was taken.
(b) If the capital goods excise tax credit allowed under
subsection (a) exceeds the taxpayer's net income tax liability,
the excess of credit over liability shall be refunded to the
taxpayer; provided that no refunds or payment on account of the
tax credit allowed by this section shall be made for amounts
less than $1.
All claims for tax credits under this section, including
any amended claims, must be filed on or before the end of the
twelfth month following the close of the taxable year for which
the credits may be claimed. Failure to comply with the
foregoing provision shall constitute a waiver of the right to
claim the credit.
(c) Application for the capital goods excise tax credit
shall be upon forms provided by the department of taxation.
(d) Sections 47 (with respect to dispositions of section
38 property and the recapture percentages) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, as of December 31, 1984, and
280F as operative for this chapter (with respect to limitation
on investment tax credit and depreciation for luxury
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 38
■iiiHiiiiiiHiBinin

Page 39 S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
automobiles; limitation where certain property used for personal
purposes) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended,
shall be operative for purposes of this section.
(e) As used in this section, the definition of section 38
property (with respect to investment in depreciable tangible
personal property) as defined by section 48(a)(1)(A), (a)(1)(B),
(a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(7), (a)(8), (a) (10) (A) , (b) , (c) , (f) , (1),
(m), and (s) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended as
of December 31, 1984, is operative for the purposes of this
section only.
(f) This section shall not apply to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2027.
(g) As used in this section:
"Cost” means the:
(1) Actual invoice price of the tangible personal
property; or
(2) Basis from which depreciation is taken under section
167 (with respect to depreciation) or from which a
deduction may be taken under section 168 (with respect
to accelerated cost recovery system) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 39
■IHlHilllilHililBH

Page 40 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D.2
whichever is less.
"Eligible depreciable tangible personal property" is
section 38 property as defined by the operative provisions of
section 48 and having a depreciable life under section 167 or
for which a deduction may be taken under section 168 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.
"Placed in service" means the earliest of the following
taxable years:
(1) The taxable year in which, under the:
(A) Taxpayer's depreciation practice, the period for
depreciation; or
(B) Accelerated cost recovery system, a claim for
recovery allowances,
with respect to the property begins; or
(2) The taxable year in which the property is placed in a
condition or state of readiness and availability for a
specifically assigned function.
"Purchase" means an acquisition of property.
"Tangible personal property" means tangible personal
property that is placed in service within Hawaii after December
31, 1987, and the purchase or importation of which resulted in a
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 40

Page 41 S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
transaction that was subject to the imposition and payment of
tax at the rate of four per cent under chapter 237 or 238.
"Tangible personal property" does not include tangible personal
property that is an integral part of a building or structure or
tangible personal property used in a foreign-trade zone, as
defined under chapter 212."
SECTION 4. Section 235-110.32, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
" [-t] §235-110.32 [4-] Renewable fuels production tax credit.
(a) Each year during the credit period, there shall be allowed
to each taxpayer subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter a
renewable fuels production tax credit that shall be applied to
the taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any, imposed by this
chapter for the taxable year in which the credit is properly
claimed.
For each taxpayer producing renewable fuels, the annual
dollar amount of the renewable fuels production tax credit
during the ten-year credit period shall be equal to 20 cents per
seventy-six thousand British thermal units of renewable fuels
using the lower heating value sold for distribution in the
State; provided that the taxpayer's production of renewable
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx

Page 42
SB. NO.
h.D. 1
C.D. 2
fuels is not less than two billion five hundred million British
thermal units of renewable fuels per calendar year; provided
further that the amount of the tax credit claimed under this
section by a taxpayer shall not exceed $3,500,000 per taxable
year; provided further that the tax credit shall only be claimed
for fuels with lifecycle emissions below that of fossil fuels.
No other tax credit may be claimed under this chapter for the
costs incurred to produce the renewable fuels that are used to
properly claim a tax credit under this section for the taxable
year.
Each taxpayer, together with all of its related entities as
determined under section 2 67 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code and
all business entities under common control, as determined under
sections 414(b), 414(c), and 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code, shall not be eligible for more than a single ten-year
credit period.
(b) In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate,
or trust, distribution and share of the renewable fuels
production tax credit shall be determined pursuant to section
704(b) (with respect to a partner's distributive share) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. For a fiscal year
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 42
■iiiiiigiiiiiiiiiiiiia

Page 43
S.B. NO.
C.D, 2
taxpayer, the taxpayer shall report the credit in the taxable
year in which the calendar year end is included.
(c) No later than thirty days following the close of the
calendar year, every taxpayer claiming a credit under this
section shall complete and file an independent, third-party
certified statement, at the taxpayer's sole expense, with and in
the form prescribed by the Hawaii state energy office, providing
the following information:
(1) The type, quantity, and British thermal unit value,
using the lower heating value, of each qualified fuel,
broken down by the type of fuel, produced and sold
during the previous calendar year;
(2) The feedstock used for each type of qualified fuel;
(3) The proposed total amount of credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled for each calendar year and the
cumulative amount of the tax credit the taxpayer
received during the credit period;
(4) The number of full-time and number of part-time
employees of the facility and those employees' states
of residency, totaled per state;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 43

Page 44
S.B. NO. So”,
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
(5) The number and location of all renewable fuel
production facilities within and outside of the State;
and
(6) The lifecycle greenhouse gas emissions per British
thermal units for each type of qualified fuel
produced.
(d) Within thirty calendar days after the due date of the
statement required under subsection (c), the Hawaii state energy
office shall:
(1) Acknowledge, in writing, receipt of the statement;
(2) Issue a certificate to the taxpayer reporting the
amount of renewable fuels produced and sold, the
amount of credit that the taxpayer is entitled to
claim for the previous calendar year, and the
cumulative amount of the tax credit during the credit
period; and
(3) Provide the taxpayer with a determination of whether
the lifecycle greenhouse gas emissions for each type
of qualified fuel produced is lower than that of
fossil fuels.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 44

Page 45
S.B. NO.
C.D.2
(e) The taxpayer shall file the certificate issued under
subsection (d) with the taxpayer's tax return with the
department of taxation. The director of taxation may audit and
adjust the certification to conform to the facts.
(f) The total amount of tax credits allowed under this
section shall not exceed $20,000,000 for all eligible taxpayers
in any calendar year. In the event that the credit claims under
this section exceed $20,000,000 for all eligible taxpayers in
any given calendar year, the $20,000,000 shall be divided
between all eligible taxpayers for that year in proportion to
the total amount of renewable fuels produced by all eligible
taxpayers. Upon reaching $20,000,000 in the aggregate, the
Hawaii state energy office shall immediately discontinue issuing
certificates and notify the department of taxation. In no
instance shall the total dollar amount of certificates issued
exceed $20,000,000 per calendar year.
(g) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
information collected and compiled by the Hawaii state energy
office under subsections (c) and (d) for the purposes of the
renewable fuels production tax credit shall be available for
public inspection and dissemination, subject to chapter 92F.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 4

Page 46
S.B. NO.
C.D.2
(h) If the credit under this section exceeds the
taxpayer's net income tax liability, the excess of the credit
over liability may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's
net income tax liability in subsequent years until exhausted,
unless otherwise elected by the taxpayer pursuant to subsections
(i) or (j). All claims for a credit under this section shall be
properly filed on or before the end of the twelfth month
following the close of the taxable year for which the credit may
be claimed. Failure to comply with the foregoing provision or
to provide the certified statement required under subsection (c)
shall constitute a waiver of the right to claim the credit.
(i) A taxpayer may elect to reduce the eligible credit
amount by thirty per cent and if this reduced amount exceeds the
amount of income tax payment due from the taxpayer, the excess
of the credit amount over payments due shall be refunded to the
taxpayer; provided that tax credit amounts properly claimed by a
taxpayer who has no income tax liability shall be paid to the
taxpayer; provided further that no refund on account of the tax
credit allowed by this section shall be made for amounts less
than $1.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 46
■iniiiiiiiiiiniiMiiiiiii

Page 47 ’ S’
S.B. NO. b i
C.D.2
The election required by this subsection shall be made in a
manner prescribed by the director on the taxpayer's return for
the taxable year in which the credit is claimed. An election
once made is irrevocable.
(j) Notwithstanding subsection (i), an individual taxpayer
may elect to have any excess of the credit over payments due
refunded to the taxpayer, if:
(1) All of the taxpayer's income is exempt from taxation
under section 235-7 (a) (2) or (3); or
(2) The taxpayer's adjusted gross income is $20,000 or
less (or $40,000 or less if filing a tax return as
married filing jointly);
provided that tax credits properly claimed by a taxpayer who has
no income tax liability shall be paid to the taxpayer; provided
further that no refund on account of the tax credit allowed by
this section shall be made for amounts less than $1.
A married couple who does not file a joint tax return shall
only be entitled to make this election to the extent that they
would have been entitled to make the election had they filed a
joint tax return.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 47
■niniiiniiiiiiiHiuaooi

Page 48 3125
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
The election required by this subsection shall be made in a
manner prescribed by the director on the taxpayer's return for
the taxable year in which the credit is claimed. An election
once made is irrevocable.
(k) Before the production of any renewable fuels for the
calendar year, the taxpayer shall provide written notice of the
taxpayer's intention to begin production of renewable fuels.
The written notice shall be provided to the department of
taxation and the Hawaii state energy office and shall include
information on the taxpayer, facility location, facility
production capacity, anticipated production start date, and the
taxpayer's contact information. Notwithstanding any other law
to the contrary, the written notice described in this
subsection, including taxpayer and facility information, shall
be available for public inspection and dissemination, subject to
chapter 92F.
(1) The taxpayer shall provide written notice to the
director of taxation and the chief energy officer of the Hawaii
state energy office within thirty days following the start of
production. The notice shall include the production start date
and expected renewable fuels production for the next twelve
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 48
ilHIIIIIIIIIHIIIIIIIIHIIIIII

Page 49
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
months. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
written notice described in this subsection shall be available
for public inspection and dissemination, subject to chapter 92F.
(m) Following each calendar year in which a credit under
this section has been claimed, the chief energy officer of the
Hawaii state energy office shall submit a written report to the
governor and legislature regarding the production and sale of
renewable fuels. The report shall include:
(1) The number and location of renewable fuels production
facilities in the State and outside the State that
have claimed a credit under this section;
{2) The total number of British thermal units of renewable
fuels, itemized by type of fuel produced and sold
during the previous calendar year; and
(3) The projected number of British thermal units of
renewable fuels production for the succeeding year.
(n) The director of taxation:
(1) Shall prepare any forms that may be necessary to claim
a tax credit under this section;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 49

Page 50 S.B. NO. ""
C.D, 2
(2) May require the taxpayer to furnish reasonable
information to ascertain the validity of the claim for
the tax credit made under this section; and
(3) May adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this section.
(o) This section shall not apply to taxable years
beginning after December 31/ 2028.
[4^] (p) As used in this section:
"Credit period" means a maximum period of ten consecutive
years, beginning from the first taxable year in which a taxpayer
begins renewable fuels production at a level of at least two
billion five-hundred million British thermal units of renewable
fuels per calendar year.
"Net income tax liability" means income tax liability
reduced by all other credits allowed under this chapter.
"Renewable feedstocks" means:
(1) Biomass crops and other renewable organic material,
including but not limited to logs, wood chips, wood
pellets, and wood bark;
(2) Agricultural residue;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 50

Page 51
S.B. NO.
C.D.2
(3) Oil crops, including but not limited to algae, canola,
jatropha, palm, soybean, and sunflower;
(4) Sugar and starch crops, including but not limited to
sugar cane and cassava;
(5) Other agricultural crops;
(6) Grease and waste cooking oil;
(7) Food wastes;
(8) Municipal solid wastes and industrial wastes;
(9) Water, including wastewater; and
(10) Animal residues and wastes,
that can be used to generate energy.
"Renewable fuels" means fuels produced from renewable
feedstocks; provided that the fuel:
(1) Is sold as a fuel in the State; and
(2) Meets the relevant ASTM International specifications
or other industry specifications for the particular
fuel, including but not limited to:
(A) Methanol, ethanol, or other alcohols;
(B) Hydrogen;
(C) Biodiesel or renewable diesel;
(D) Biogas;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 51
■■MiiiiiniHinH

Page 52
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(E) Other biofuels;
(F) Renewable jet fuel or renewable gasoline; or
(G) Logs, wood chips, wood pellets, or wood bark."
PART II
SECTION 5. Section 235-110.9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
[ "§3-35-110.9—High technology buainoao invoatment tax
oredit^-----{-aj-- Thore ohall be allowed to each taxpayer oubjoct to
the -taxes imposed by.t-hio—chapter a high- feechnology- buoiness
investment tax credit that shall be deductible from-the
taxpayer’s net income tax liability,—if—any,—imposed by thio
chapter for the taxable year in which the investment was made
and the followi-ng--four years provided the credit is properly
claimed.-- The tax oredit ohall be as follows!
- fir)- In—the—year-^the—iftveeimeftt—was-^ftade-f—thirty-five per
cent;
- (2-)- in—the—fir st- year following the year in which- the
invost-mont was-mado,—twenty—five—pen-eent-T-
- (-3)- In the second year following the invoatment,—twenty
per cent;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 52
iniiioHiinininniii

Page 53
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
- {-44- In the third year following the inveotment,—ten—per-
cent;—aed
- {-54- In tho fourth year following the inveotment,—ten per
cent,*
of the inveotment made by the taxpayer in oaoh qualified-high
toohnology busineoo,—up to a maximum allowed-—eredi-tr- in t-he- year
tho inveotment -wao made?—$700,000-;—in the firo-t--yoar following
dhe-^j^eer—ie—wheeh-^the-drfweefeffteftt—wee-made;—$500,000;—in the
-eeeeftd-^ee35—feliewiftg^^fehe-^fe€H?—ie—whi-eh—"the—ieveefemeet—wae-rftadeT-
$400, Q-&0-;—in the-third ■ year--fellowing tho year in-whieh----t-ho
invootment wao made,—$-2-Q0-,-O0€)-;—and in tho fourth year following
the-^^ea^?—ifi—whieh—the-drftveetffteet—wee—madej—$200,000 .
- {te4-- Tho orodit allowed under--thie-oeetion ohall bo -olaime-d
againot tho not inoomo tax liability for tho taxable year.--Fer^
the—perpeee—ef-thie—eeetieeT—"not income tax liability” moans
not income tax liability—reduecd by all other crodito all-ewed
under thio -chapt-er-r-
- {-e4-- if—the-^tax—eredit—eeder—thie—eeetiee—exeeeds-^fehe
taxpayer's income tax liability for any of the five yearo that
tho credit io taken,—the cxcooo -ef-the--tax credit over liabil-fty
may be-uocd as- a—e-redit againot- the taxpayer’s income tax
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 53
■gUOIIIIIIIIIHIMIIIIil

Page 54
S.B. NO.
C.D.2
liability in aubooqucnt yoaro until oxhauotcd.--Every claim/
including amended claims-,—for a tax -er-edit under-this section
shall be -filed-on- or before the end of the twelfth month
following thc--cloGO of-- thc taxable year -for—w-hich-thc credit may
be claimed.-- F-a-iluro -to comply with the foregoing provislen
sbeH^-eenetirtete—a—waiver—of—the—right—do—etaifft—the—ereditr-r
- id)-- if—at—the—eiese--ef—any—taxetbie—year—ift-the—five—year
period—in—s-ubseetien—(-a) i
- iH- iho-buoincso-ne—longer qualifies as—a—qualified high
technology buoinoss;
- iS-i The buoinoss or—an—interest—in—the ■buoinoss has boon
oold by the taxpayer inveoting in the qualified high
technology buoinc-oe-;—or
- The-da-xpayer -has withdrawn the taxpayer’s investment
wholly or partially from the qualified high technology
buoineos ,*
the credit claimed under thio section shall bo rocaptu-r-ed-.—fhe
recapture shall be equal to ton per cent—ef—the■amount' of the
total tax e-redit- -claimed under - -this -seet-ion in the ■■preceding-two
box-able yearo.-- The amount of- the- credit- recaptured' shall--apply
only to the investment in the particular qualified high
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 5

Page 55
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
technology -buDincoo that moot a-the ■ roquir-emcnte—par-ag-r-aph
■(■1 )-7—(-2-H——H-H-- The rocapture provisiono of thi-o oubseet-ion
shall not apply to a tax credit claimed far—a-qualified high
technology business that docs not fall within the provioi-e-as ■ of
paragraph—Hr)-;—15-)-7—or—(-3-)-:-- The—amount of the recaptured -tax
credit determined under thio subsoe-fe-ien shall bo added to the
taxpayer’s tax liability for the taxable year in-which the
recapture oceu-ag-o—under this subsection;
- (-e)-- Every -taxpayer,—beTere—March 34—&T—each--year--ift—whi-eh
an investment in a qu-a-l-i-f-lcd-h-igh-tcehno-l-eg-y- busincss- wao-^adc
in -the previous taxable year,—shall submit a writ-een;—certified
statement -fe-o- the di-rector-of taxation - identifyi-ng-.*-
- Hr)- Qualified investments,—if any-;—expended in the
previous taxable year;—and
------(-2-)- The amount of tax credits cla-imed- pursuant to thio
section,—if any,—in the pr-e-vi-ouo taxable year.
-- The—departmon-t-oh-all;
- Hr)- Maintain records of the namoo and addr-cooco of the
taxpayers claiming the credits under thio section and
the total amount of the qualif-ied investment cooto
upon which the tax credit is baocd;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 55

Page 56 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
4-3-)- Verify nafeurc and amount of the qualifying
inveotmonto;
Total all qualifying and cumulative invoatmenta - that
the department certifioa;—and
- H4- Gcr-fe-lf-y—fehc—amount of the-tax credit "for each taxable
year and cumulative amount of' the tax credit ■■■
Upon each determination made under thio—oubocction,—the
department ohal-1' ioouc a certificate ■to-tho'-taxpaycr-ve-rd.-tying
information- ■oubmitted-to- the department—inc-ludi-ng -qua 1-i-f-ying
inveotment amounto,—the credit amount certified for--each -t-a-xablo
year-?—and the-eumu-lative amount of the tax credit during the
credit perde-d.-- T-hc taxpayer ohall filo the certificate with the
taxpayer'□—tax return with the department.
The director of taxation-may aooooa -and--coll-ect a--fce- to
offoct the cooto of certifying tax -cr-edito claimo under thio
occt-icn-;-- All fccD—collected under thio—ooction ohall be
depooited inte-thc- tax adminiotration opccial fund-ea-tabl-i-ohcd
under -Gcction 235-20.5.
------fg)-- Ao uocd in thio ocction;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 56
IlilllllllllHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 57 3125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
"InvGstment tjax—crodit ■ allocation ■ rati-o" mcano,—with
rcopcGt to a taxpoy-er that-ha a ■ made an' invcotmont -in a qualified
high technology buoincao/—the -ratio of ;-
-H4- The amount of the credit-under thio aoction that io,
er—i-a—to—be-^—roee-i-vod by -or allocated to the ta-xpaycr
over the- -life- of "the ■ inveotment,—as—a—reeu-tfe—ef-^fehe
inveotment;—fee
4-3-)- T-he--amount of the inveotment in the qua-l-ified high
t-cch-nelogy buoincoa.
"Qualified high technology buoincoo-" - mcano a buoincoa,
employing or owning capital or property/—er—maintaining an
-efef-iee-;—in thio State; provided that;
44-)- Mere-^fedan—feifefey-^er^-eeftt^-efe—fefes—feefeal^^aeiaee-e
-aefeivifeiree—are—qaaiifeied—reeeared;—and^-revidod
further that the buoincoo conducto more than
oevonty—feivc--per—cent of ito qualificd--rcaearch in
thio State;—er
4-34- More than oovon-ty-fivc per eon-t-of ito grooo income io
derived from- qualified rcocarch;—aed-^revided—fearfeder
that -thio—income—ie—received-from;
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 57
■■nilllllBHIilHilllll

Page 58
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
Producto oold from-/—manufactured in,—or produced
in thio State;—
4©)- Servi-eeo performed in- thi-o—State;
"Qualified- rcKJcarch" moano-the—oamo ao-dofined in ooetion
235-7.3.
4h-)-- Common law principlco^—including the doctrine of
economic o-ubatance and buoi-neoo-purpooc,—ohall apply-—feo any
invootment-;-- T-her-e-ex-i-gt-o—a preoumption - that a tranoaetion
oatiofico the doctrine ■el—economic oubotance and buoincoo
purpooe to the extent that—t-he—o-poei-al -a-l-l-ocation--of-the high
technology buoin-eaa- tax credit hao an--invoatment-"tax credit
ratio-of 1.5 or l-oo-o of credit for evo-ry dollar--i-nvootod.-
Tran0-act-len-g—for—which an invootment tax credit allocation
ratio greater than 1.5 but not-more than 2-.-Q-of credit for---cvcry
dollar inveoted and claimed ma-y^c reviewed by the -depa-rt-ment
for applicable doc-t-rinco of economic oubotance and buoincoo
purpo&o-.-
Buoineoseo- claiming a tax credit for tranoaetiono with
invootment tax credit allocation ratios greater t-ha-n-2-.-Q—of-
credit for every doll-a-r--i-n-voot-od shall -oubofeantiato economic
merit-and buoincoo purpooe conoiotent with t-hio ooetion.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 58

Page 59
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
-Hr) For—arnvcotmonta made on or—after May—1,—2009,
■notwithstanding any other law- -fee the contrary;—no allocations,
special or otherwise,—of credits under—lihis section may cKcccd
the amount of the inveahment made-by--the taxpayer ultimately
claiming thio-eredit,•—and inveotmcnt--h-a-x credit alloca-t-ion
ratios greater -than 1 .-Q- of credit—for c-very dol-lar invested
shall not be allowed.-- In addition,—the credit shall-be- allowed
■eniy—in—a-eeerdanee—wibh—aubseebien—(a)
-0-)-- Thio section shall not app-I-y—to taxable years
beginning after December 31,—2010.” ]
SECTION 6. Section 235-110.51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
[ ”§235-110 -. 51—Technology infraatrueturc renovation tax
credit;---(-a-)-- There oharll be allowed—fee- each- taxpayer oubj-oct—to
the feaxes imposed by-t-hio chapter,—an income tax credit which
shall be dcduet-iblc—from the—ta-xpaycr' o net income tax
liability,—if any,—lmpoocdrby--fehis chapter for the taxable year
in which the credit—is-properly- claimed-.
-(b^-- The-amount of - the credit oha-il be four per cent of the
renovafe-ion costs incurred during the-taxable year for each
commercial building located in-Hawaii.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 5

Page 60
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
-fe-)-- In the cqog of a partncrohip,—S corporation,—ootato,
truat>—or any dcvolopcr of a conffnoroial b-uild-i-n-g/—the tax credit
aj.-lowablc io for renovation coato incurred by the entity--for the
taxable yoa-r—-- The coat upon—whi-ch- the tax credit ia computed
■ohall -be determined at the entit-y-l-ev-ei--- Diotribu-tion- and- aharc
of—credit ahall be determined purauant to 3cction--S35-110'.-?-(a-) ;
-(d^-- I-f—a—deduofe-ioft—ie—"taken—uftder^-eeetrien—1-7-9—(-widh
reapect to election to exponae dcpreei-ablc ■ bua-incoa aoacta)—ef-
the Internal Revenue Code,—no tax credit--ahal-lr-be—a-l-lowod-^or
that portion ef—the ■renovat-ion -eeet—for—which the dedeetien—ie
taken.
-(-e)-- The baaia of eligible property for depreciation- or
accelerated-eeet—recovery oyotem purpoaca for atatc income taxca
ohall be reduced by the amount of credit■allowable -ond-elaimcd.
-I-n—t-he- altor-na-ti-ve>—the- taxpayer ohall treat the amount of the
credit allowable and claimed ao a taxable income item for the
taxable year in which it io properly- r-ceegnl-zcd under the method
of accounting uoed to compute taxable—ineoffte-r
-- The credit allowed under thie-acetion- ohall be claimed
againot the net income—ta-x liability for the taxable year.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 60
iniiiiiiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiga

Page 61
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
-{-g-)-- i^-^fefee-^fe-ax—etedit^-aftdes-^fefeie—seettoft—e*eeede—
taxpayer'o-income tax liability,—febe—exeeoa ©f—credit over
liability may-be ■■carried forward until- exhauated.
-- The tax credit- allowcd-undcr thia scctian ohall not be
avail-able for taxable --year-e—begin^ning after- DoGombo-r—3-I7—2010.
-(aH-- Ao -uaed in thio ocction-!-
"Not- in-eame-tax liability"- moano - income tax liability
reduced by all -o-teher -erodi-t-o-a-l-lowcd under thia chapter.
"Renovation---&oot-o---meano-coota incurred after Dccombor 31,
200-6-?—to plan,—dcaign,—inatall,—conotruet,—and purehaoo
tcchnQlogy-onablcd infraatructurc-equipment-■to provide-a
commercial bu-i^rding with technology-enabled infraotructurc.
"Technology-enabled -infraatructurc” meana;
-(4-)- High apecd-telccommunicationo oyotoma that provide
Internet acccoo>—direct- oatollitc communicationo
acccao/—and vidcoeonforencing--£-a-eilitico,*
42-)- Phyaical occur4t-y—oyotoma that- identify and verify
valid entry to -oceurc apacca,—detect- invalid entry or
entry—attempto,—and monitor activity in theoc apacca,*
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 61
■■uiiniinininniii

Page 62
S.B. NO.
h.D. 1
C.D. 2
4-3-)- Environmental syatcme to include hcati-ftg->—ventilation,
air conditioning,—fi^-e—detection and ouppreooion,—aftd
ethrer——aad
4-44- Baefeup—and—emergaaey—elreatrie-pawa3?-ayatems-;-
-- Mo taxpayer that claima a credit under thio aect-icn
ohall' clai-m-aay -et-hcr credi-t -under' th-is—chapter . " ]
SECTION 7. Act 261, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019, as
amended by Act 139, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by
amending section 5 to read as follows:
"SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that:
(1) Section 2 shall apply to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2019; and
(2) Part II shall take effect on [January 1/—2030.]
January 1, 2029."
PART III
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that:
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 62

Page 63 S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
(1) Section 1 shall apply retroactively to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2025; provided that the
amendments to section 235-12.5 (a), Hawaii Revised
Statutes, shall apply to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2026;
(2) Sections 2, 3, and 4 shall apply to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2026;
(3) Section 6 shall take effect on January 1, 2028; and
(4) Section 5 shall take effect on January 1, 2029.
SB3125 CD2 LRB 26-1372.docx 63

S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
APPROVED this 21st day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B. No. 3125, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 3125, SD 1,HD 1,CD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives